South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3442.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 36-1-201(b)(24) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (24) "Money" means a medium of exchange currently authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government. The term includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between two or more countries. "Money" does not include a central bank digital currency. For purposes of this item, "central bank digital currency" means digital medium of exchange, or digital monetary unit of account issued by the United States Federal Reserve System, a federal agency, a foreign government, a foreign central bank, or a foreign reserve system that is made directly available to a consumer by such entities and that is processed or validated directly by such entities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----